California, session 20252026, SB928.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 89500.3 is added to the Education Code, to read:89500.3. (a) (1) For purposes of this section, “faculty employee” includes, but is not limited to, an employee of the California State University who is a professor, lecturer, librarian, counselor, or coach.(2) The faculty employee positions described in paragraph (1) include, but are not limited to, instructional and noninstructional positions.(3) The faculty employee positions described in paragraph (1) include, but are not limited to, full-time, part-time, probationary, tenured, temporary, and extension for credit positions.(b) The instructor of record for a course of instruction shall be a person who meets the rule to serve as a faculty employee teaching credit instruction or a faculty employee teaching noncredit instruction established pursuant to Section 89500.(c) A California State University faculty employee shall be a person who meets the rule to serve in that position established pursuant to Section 89500.(d) This section does not prohibit California State University employees from using artificial intelligence tools to assist in the operations of the California State University or in providing services to California State University students.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to protect California State University employees from the encroachment of artificial intelligence.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________